test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV_REP-0i-tsidiitla_run-away_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - tsídiitł'á[run-away] :
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg1:       nátsídistł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg2:       nátsídíítł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg3:       nátsídiitł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1:       [nátsídiìtł'ásh, nátsídaàtł'ásh]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1+Distr: [nádàtsídiìtł'ásh, nádàtsídaàtł'ásh]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2:       nátsídastł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2+Distr: nádàtsídastł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3:       nátsígídiitł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3+Distr: nádàtsígídiitł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4:       nátsíts'ídiitł'ásh
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4+Distr: nádàtsíts'ídiitł'ásh
